incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
    <pardef n="ba/rr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rra</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irr</l>
          <r>rr<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="po/ll__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>ll<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="madra/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cú/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="craic/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eanna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eanna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eanna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eanna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bainne/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mí/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="madra"><par n="m_init"/><i>adra</i><par n="madra/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mála"><par n="m_init"/><i>ála</i><par n="madra/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cailín"><par n="c_init"/><i>ailín</i><par n="madra/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bata"><par n="b_init"/><i>ata</i><par n="madra/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cú"><par n="c_init"/><i>ú</i><par n="cú/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="craic"><par n="c_init"/><i>raic</i><par n="craic/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bainne"><par n="b_init"/><i>ainne</i><par n="bainne/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mí"><par n="m_init"/><i>í</i><par n="mí/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="airdeall"><par n="a_init"/><i>irdea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aiteall"><par n="a_init"/><i>itea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aogall"><par n="a_init"/><i>oga</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atall"><par n="a_init"/><i>ta</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ball"><par n="b_init"/><i>a</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bastall"><par n="b_init"/><i>asta</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brothall"><par n="b_init"/><i>rotha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buabhall"><par n="b_init"/><i>uabha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="capall"><par n="c_init"/><i>apa</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="carball"><par n="c_init"/><i>arba</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caschall"><par n="c_init"/><i>ascha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cochall"><par n="c_init"/><i>ocha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coinníoll"><par n="c_init"/><i>oinnío</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cóipinneall"><par n="c_init"/><i>óipinnea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coll"><par n="c_init"/><i>o</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhall"><par n="c_init"/><i>omha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhbhall"><par n="c_init"/><i>omhbha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhthadhall"><par n="c_init"/><i>omhthadha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="connall"><par n="c_init"/><i>onna</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crapall"><par n="c_init"/><i>rapa</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crogall"><par n="c_init"/><i>roga</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cruinnmheall"><par n="c_init"/><i>ruinnmhea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dall"><par n="d_init"/><i>a</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dícheall"><par n="d_init"/><i>íchea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doicheall"><par n="d_init"/><i>oichea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dúnpholl"><par n="d_init"/><i>únpho</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eireaball"><i>eireaba</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feall"><par n="f_init"/><i>ea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fochall"><par n="f_init"/><i>ocha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forimeall"><par n="f_init"/><i>orimea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galinneall"><par n="g_init"/><i>alinnea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gearrchapall"><par n="g_init"/><i>earrchapa</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gránúll"><par n="g_init"/><i>ránú</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guairdeall"><par n="g_init"/><i>uairdea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inneall"><i>innea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Learpholl"><i>Learpho</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lochall"><i>locha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="macall"><par n="m_init"/><i>aca</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mearbhall"><par n="m_init"/><i>earbha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mogall"><par n="m_init"/><i>oga</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mórthimpeall"><par n="m_init"/><i>órthimpea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="murtall"><par n="m_init"/><i>urta</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nuall"><i>nua</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peall"><par n="p_init"/><i>ea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puball"><par n="p_init"/><i>uba</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="réamhchoinníoll"><i>réamhchoinnío</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sárthadhall"><par n="s_init"/><i>árthadha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scafall"><par n="s_init"/><i>cafa</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scamall"><par n="s_init"/><i>cama</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scofall"><par n="s_init"/><i>cofa</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="screaball"><par n="s_init"/><i>creaba</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scrupall"><par n="s_init"/><i>crupa</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seachmall"><par n="s_init"/><i>eachma</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sliospholl"><par n="s_init"/><i>liospho</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sroigheall"><par n="s_init"/><i>roighea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tamall"><par n="t_init"/><i>ama</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teampall"><par n="t_init"/><i>eampa</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="toll"><par n="t_init"/><i>o</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troll"><par n="t_init"/><i>ro</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="urthimpeall"><par n="u_init"/><i>rthimpea</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
